Utah statutes.
59-1-602.   Right to appeal -- Venue -- County as party in interest.
(1) (a)  Any aggrieved party appearing before the commission or county whose
tax revenues are affected by the decision may at that party's option petition
for judicial review in the district court pursuant to this section, or in the
Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals pursuant to Section 59-1-610.
(b)  Judicial review of formal or informal adjudicative proceedings in the
district is in the district court located in the county of residence or
principal place of business of the affected taxpayer or, in the case of a
taxpayer whose taxes are assessed on a statewide basis, to the Third Judicial
District Court in and for Salt Lake County.
(c)  Notwithstanding Section 63G-4-402, a petition for review made to the
district court under this section shall conform to the Utah Rules of Appellate
Procedure.
(2)  A county whose tax revenues are affected by the decision being reviewed
shall be allowed to be a party in interest in the proceeding before the court.
